Utah statutes.
10-6-117.   Appropriations not to exceed estimated expendable revenue -- Determination of revenue -- Appropriations for existing deficits.

(1)  The governing body of any city may not make any appropriation in the final budget of any fund in excess of the estimated expendable revenue for the budget period of the fund.

(2)  In determining the estimated expendable revenue of the general fund for the budget period, there shall be included therein as an appropriation from the fund balance that portion of the fund balance at the close of the last completed fiscal period, not previously included in the budget of the current period, that exceeds the amount permitted in Section 10-6-116.

(3)  There shall be included as an item of appropriation in each fund for any budget period any existing deficit as of the close of the last completed fiscal period, not previously included in the budget of the current period, to the extent of at least 5% of the total revenue of the fund in its last completed fiscal period. If the total amount of the deficit is less than 5% of the total revenue in the last completed fiscal period, the entire amount of the deficit shall be included.

